Washington statutes.
RCW 35.39.050

Construction—1965 c 7.

RCW 35.39.030 shall be deemed cumulative and not exclusive and shall be additional to any other power or authority granted any city or town.

[ 1983 c 3 s 56; 1965 c 7 s 35.39.050. Prior: 1943 c 92 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5646-15.]